Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.130

Suspension of license—Appeal.

(1) The director shall immediately suspend the license of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a child support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for a license under this chapter during the suspension, reissuance of the license is automatic upon the board's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the child support order. The procedure in RCW 74.20A.320 is the exclusive administrative remedy for contesting the establishment of noncompliance with a child support order, and suspension of a license under this subsection, and satisfies the requirements of RCW 34.05.422.

(2) The director, with the assistance of the board, shall establish by rule under what circumstances a home inspector license may be suspended or revoked. These circumstances shall be based upon accepted industry standards and the board's cumulative experience.

(3) Any person aggrieved by a decision of the director under this section may appeal the decision as provided in chapter 34.05 RCW. The adjudicative proceeding shall be conducted under chapter 34.05 RCW by an administrative law judge appointed pursuant to RCW 34.12.030.

[ 2008 c 119 s 13.]